Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.035

Memorandum of agreement or contract for secretary of state's services with state agencies or private entities.

The secretary of state shall have the authority to enter into a memorandum of agreement or contract with any agency of state government or private entity to provide for the performance of any of the secretary of state's services or duties under the various corporation statutes of this state.

[ 1985 c 156 s 19; 1982 c 35 s 190.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1985 c 156: "Sections 1 through 19, 21, and 23 through 26 shall take effect on January 1, 1986." [ 1985 c 156 s 27.]

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.